Maine, session 132, LD950.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 19-A MRSA §4103, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 298, §§4 to 6, is
further amended to read:
2. Minor child Child. A child, a person responsible for a child, as defined in Title
22, section 4002, subsection 9, or a representative of the department when a minor child
has been:
A. A victim of abuse as defined in section 4102, subsection 1 by a family or household
member, a dating partner or an individual related by consanguinity or affinity; or
B. A victim of conduct:
(1) Described as stalking in Title 17‑A, section 210‑A;
(2) Constituting any crime described in Title 17‑A, chapter 11;
(3) Described as unauthorized dissemination of certain private images in Title
17‑A, section 511‑A;
(4) Described as aggravated sex trafficking or sex trafficking in Title 17‑A, section
852 or 853, respectively;
(5) Described as sexual exploitation of a minor or dissemination of sexually
explicit material in Title 17‑A, section 282 or 283, respectively;
(6) Described as harassment by telephone or by electronic communication device
in Title 17‑A, section 506, subsection 1, paragraph A‑1 or A‑2; or
(7) Constituting a civil cause of action under Title 14, section 8305.
For purposes of this paragraph, the conduct need not have been perpetrated by a family
or household member, a dating partner or an individual related by consanguinity or
affinity;
Page 1 - 132LR0850(03)